Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5693.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 31b. (1) Every 2 years, or sooner at the request of the board of county commissioners or of 2 or more municipalities located in whole or part in the county, an independent auditor designated by the attorney general shall audit the office of county drain commissioner. The audit must include all of the following: (a) The books, records, accounts, and funds of the drain commissioner and of the county drains and drainage districts under the jurisdiction of the drain commissioner. (b) The administration of the drains and drainage districts by the drain commissioner. (c) The performance by the drain commissioner of the duties of the drain commissioner under this act and other authority. (2) The drain commissioner and the office of the county drain commissioner's employees shall produce for the auditor's inspection and examination the books of account and papers of the office of county drain commissioner and truthfully answer all questions of the auditor relating to the books of account and papers of the office of county drain commissioner. (3) The auditor shall prepare a report of the examination and findings of the audit. The auditor shall file a copy of the report with the board of county commissioners and a copy with the county clerk of the respective county. The county clerk shall retain the report. (4) The costs of an audit under this section must be charged against the county and must be paid from the general fund of the county. However, if 2 or more municipalities request the audit, the county shall pay 50% of the costs and each municipality requesting the audit shall pay a share of the costs equal to 50% divided by the number of municipalities requesting the audit.